Utah statutes.
53A-1-603.   Duties of State Board of Education.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), the State Board of Education shall:
(a)  require each school district and charter school to implement the Utah
Performance Assessment System for Students, hereafter referred to as U-PASS;
(b)  require the state superintendent of public instruction to submit and
recommend criterion-referenced achievement tests or online computer adaptive
tests, a tenth grade basic skills competency test, an online writing
assessment for grades 5 and 8, and a test for students in grade 3 to measure
reading grade level to the board for approval and adoption and distribution to
each school district and charter school by the state superintendent;
(c)  develop an assessment method to uniformly measure statewide performance,
school district performance, and school performance of students in grades 3
through 12 in mastering basic skills courses; and
(d)  provide for the state to participate in the National Assessment of
Educational Progress state-by-state comparison testing program.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (5) and Subsection 53A-1-611(6), under
U-PASS, the state office shall annually require that each district and charter
school, as applicable, administer:
(a)  as determined by the State Board of Education, statewide criterion-
referenced tests or online computer adaptive tests in grades 3 through 12 and
courses in basic skill areas of the core curriculum;
(b)  an online writing assessment to all students in grades 5 and 8;
(c)  a tenth grade basic skills competency test as detailed in Section
53A-1-611; and
(d)  a test to all students in grade 3 to measure reading grade level.
(3)  The board shall adopt rules for the conduct and administration of U-PASS
to include the following:
(a)  the computation of student performance based on information that is
disaggregated with respect to race, ethnicity, gender, limited English
proficiency, and those students who qualify for free or reduced price school
lunch;
(b)  security features to maintain the integrity of the system, which could
include statewide uniform testing dates, multiple test forms, and test
administration protocols;
(c)  the exemption of student test scores, by exemption category, such as
limited English proficiency, mobility, and students with disabilities, with
the percent or number of student test scores exempted being publically
reported at a district level;
(d)  compiling of criterion-referenced, online computer adaptive, and online
writing test scores and test score averages at the classroom level to allow
for:
(i)  an annual review of those scores by parents of students and professional
and other appropriate staff at the classroom level at the earliest point in
time;
(ii)  the assessment of year-to-year student progress in specific classes,
courses, and subjects;
(iii)  a teacher to review, prior to the beginning of a new school year, test
scores from the previous school year of students who have been assigned to the
teacher's class for the new school year; and
(iv)  allowing a school district or charter school to have its tests
administered and scored electronically to accelerate the review of test scores
and their usefulness to parents and educators under Subsections (3)(d)(i),
(ii), and (iii), without violating the integrity of U-PASS; and
(e)  providing that:
(i)  scores on the tests and assessments required under Subsection (2)(a)
shall be considered in determining a student's academic grade for the
appropriate course and whether a student shall advance to the next grade
level; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection 53A-1-611(6), the student's score on
the tenth grade basic skills competency test shall be recorded on the
student's transcript of credits.
(4)  The State Board of Education shall consider administering the basic
skills competency test on a Saturday to preserve instructional time.
(5) (a)  The State Board of Education may exempt a school district or charter
school from the testing requirements specified in Subsection (2) if:
(i)  the school district or charter school pilots an assessment system that
incorporates the following:
(A)  online classroom-based assessment that utilizes adaptive testing;
(B)  online writing assessments in grades 4 through 12; or
(C)  assessments administered in grades 8, 10, and 11 to determine readiness
for postsecondary education;
(ii)  the State Board of Education approves the specific assessment
administered under Subsection (5)(a)(i) and the assessment provider; and
(iii)  the school district or charter school verifies the local fiscal
capability and resources needed to participate in the pilot assessment system.
(b)  A school district or charter school that receives an exemption under
Subsection (5)(a) is subject to an accountability plan and high school
graduation standards that are:
(i)  based on the school district's or charter school's assessment system,
which may include assessments described in Subsection (2) or Subsections
(5)(a)(i) through (iii); and
(ii)  developed and adopted by the State Board of Education.
(c)  By the November 2014 meeting of the Education Interim Committee, the
State Board of Education shall submit recommendations to the committee on the
state's assessment system.
(6) (a)  A school district or charter school, as applicable, is encouraged to
administer an online writing assessment to students in grade 11.
(b)  The State Board of Education may award a grant to a school district or
charter school to pay for an online writing assessment and instruction program
that may be used to assess the writing of students in grade 11.
(7) (a)  On or before the 2010 October meeting of the Education Interim
Committee, the State Board of Education shall prepare and present its plan for
a pilot program for the 2010-11 and 2011-12 school years to:
(i)  replace the tenth grade basic skills competency test with computer
adaptive testing of basic skills; and
(ii)  administer the ACT exam to secondary students.
(b)  The State Board of Education shall implement the pilot program described
in Subsection (7)(a) for the 2010-11 and 2011-12 school years.
(c)  The State Board of Education shall re-direct the money saved by not
administering the tenth grade basic skills competency test pursuant to
Subsection 53A-1-611(6) to fund the implementation of the pilot program
described in Subsection (7)(b) for fiscal years 2010-11 and 2011-12.
